Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-3906
Misdemeanor defendant; indigent; counties with no public defender; court-appointed counsel; compensation.

In counties not having public defenders, the court may appoint an attorney licensed to practice law in this state to represent any indigent person who is charged with a misdemeanor offense punishable by imprisonment. When such a defendant asserts indigency, the court shall make a reasonable inquiry to determine the defendant's financial condition and may require him or her to execute an affidavit of indigency. Attorneys appointed pursuant to this section shall be compensated in the manner provided by section 29-3905 with application being made to the appointing court.

Laws 1975, LB 285, § 3;

Laws 1979, LB 241, § 6;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1804.13;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 24.